Utah statutes.
17-36-35.   County officials -- Profit from public funds.
If the governing body receives evidence that a county official is profiting
from public money or uses it for any unauthorized purpose, the matter shall be
promptly referred to the county attorney or district attorney for appropriate
action. If convicted for any such offense, the county official shall
immediately forfeit his office.
